Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB166.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 9711(c)(1)(iv) of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 9711. Sentencing procedure for murder of the first degree.* * *(c) Instructions to jury.--(1) Before the jury retires to consider the sentencing verdict, the court shall instruct the jury on the following matters:* * *(iv) The verdict must be a sentence of death if the jury unanimously finds at least one aggravating circumstance specified in subsection (d) and no mitigating circumstance or if the jury unanimously finds 12345678910111213141516171819 one or more aggravating circumstances which outweigh any mitigating circumstances beyond a reasonable doubt. The verdict must be a sentence of life imprisonment in all other cases.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0166PN0124 - 2 - 123456